District of Columbia statutes.
34-1238

Repealed

Effect of specific time for performance.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 39, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1838.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).